Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 3. Public School Building and Facilities Modernization.

§ 22.1-141.1.
Standards for buildings and facilities.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that new public school buildings and facilities and improvements and renovations to existing public school buildings and facilities be designed, constructed, maintained, and operated to generate more electricity than consumed and that such energy-positive building design be based on industry standards (i) contained in the design guide of the American Society of Heating, Refrigeration and Air-Conditioning Engineers (ASHRAE), entitled “Achieving Zero Energy-Advanced Energy Design Guide for K-12 School Buildings,” dated February 1, 2018, and any subsequent updates or (ii) similar industry standards.

History.

2019, cc. 818, 819.

Cross references.

As to energy generation by public school buildings and facilities, see § 56-589.1.

§ 22.1-141.2.
Authority to modernize public school lease agreements.

Prior to undertaking the design, construction, maintenance, and operation of a new public school building or facility or the improvement or renovation of an existing school building or facility, a local school board may evaluate whether entering into a lease with a private entity will assist the school board in meeting the standards set forth in § 22.1-141.1.

In order to meet the design, construction, maintenance, and operation standards set forth in § 22.1-141.1, a school board may enter into a lease with a private entity that may include the following: (i) design of the building and facilities; (ii) construction of the building and facilities; (iii) financing of the project as defined in §

15.2-1815

; (iv) operation of the heating, cooling, and renewable energy systems, including interconnect agreements with the regulated electric utility, maintenance of all such systems, responding to comfort complaints, and any other operational or maintenance-related issues during the lease term; and (v) such other terms as mutually agreed upon by the local school board and the private entity. Such lease may (a) be for the real property primarily used by the local school board and owned by the private entity, (b) be a capital or operating lease, (c) be exempt from real property taxation pursuant to subdivision (a) (1) of Article X, Section 6 of the Constitution of Virginia, and (d) contain a covenant that the rent shall not be reduced from the rent stated in the lease. Such lease shall not exceed 35 years in duration. The Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.) or the Public-Private Education Facilities and Infrastructure Act (§ 56-575.1 et seq.) shall apply to any lease agreement solicited by a local school board pursuant to this section.

History.

2019, cc. 818, 819.